Hawaii statutes.
[PART
II.] STATE INTERIM ACTION LEVELS

FOR
CONTAMINANTS IN WATER

[§340E-21] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

"EPA risk assessment guidelines"
means guidelines developed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency
for the assessment of health risks from environmental pollutants and includes,
but is not limited to, Guidelines for Estimating Exposures, Guidelines for
Mutagenicity Risk Assessment, Guidelines for the Health Assessment of Suspect
Developmental Toxicants, and Guidelines for the Health Risk Assessment of
Chemical Mixtures.

"Federal drinking water guidelines"
means a proposed maximum contamination level, health advisory, or other
guidance developed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency to
assist a state agency in responding to a contaminant in drinking water for
which no maximum contamination level (MCL) is established.

"Interim action level" means a level
established by the director of health for a contaminant in a public drinking
water supply for which a maximum contamination level is not established by the
EPA.

"Reliable analytical data" means
information approved by the director as indicating the presence of a
contaminant in a water sample at or above the limit of detection and developed
according to generally recognized standards of good field practices and good
laboratory practices for sampling and analysis of contaminants in water. [L
1987, c 297, pt of §2(2)]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next